Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB253.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 41 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Occupational license fee" means any occupational license fee levied by a
local taxing jurisdiction under KRS 67.083, 68.180, 68.197, 91.200, or
92.281; and
(b) "System" means the centralized occupational license fee collection and
reporting system developed under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) On or before January 1, 2028, the Office of the State Treasurer shall develop and
maintain a web-based system for the centralized reporting, collection, and
distribution of occupational license fees. The State Treasurer may contract with a
third party for the development and operation of the system. The system shall:
(a) Accommodate the payment and reporting of occupational license fees by a
business, including allowing payment and reporting to occur in a single
transaction regardless of the number of local taxing jurisdictions involved;
(b) Allow businesses to view the occupational license fee rate and related rate
base information for each local taxing jurisdiction imposing an
occupational license fee; and
(c) Provide local taxing jurisdictions access to the occupational license fee
information reported by a business for auditing and compliance purposes.
(3) Revenues collected by the system shall be distributed to the applicable local taxing
jurisdictions within twelve (12) hours of receipt.
(4) The State Treasurer may impose an annual fee on businesses using the system to
help offset the cost of the system's development and maintenance.
(5) Businesses shall not be mandated to use the system and shall continue to have the
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/3/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 301
option to report and pay occupational license fees directly to local taxing
jurisdictions.
(6) The State Treasurer shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A, which establish:
(a) The amount of any fees imposed by the State Treasurer on businesses using
the system;
(b) Procedures for local taxing jurisdictions to submit or update their
occupational license fee rate and related rate base information to the State
Treasurer;
(c) A registration system for businesses to access the system;
(d) A universal template for businesses to use to report their occupational
license fees and remit any accompanying payment;
(e) Procedures for local taxing jurisdictions to access the occupational license
fee information reported by businesses;
(f) A distribution process for occupational license fee revenues collected
through the system; and
(g) Reporting requirements related to providing occupational license fee
information to the State Treasurer.
(7) The State Treasurer shall not be responsible for:
(a) Auditing the occupational license fee information provided by businesses or
local taxing jurisdictions;
(b) Ensuring that businesses comply with the local taxing jurisdiction's
occupational license fee requirements;
(c) Verifying the amount of occupational license fees paid by businesses; or
(d) Issuing credits or refunds from the system to businesses.
(8) Occupational license fees reported and paid through the system shall be subject
to the same auditing and compliance requirements as occupational license fees
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/3/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 301
reported and paid directly to the local taxing jurisdiction outside of the system.
(9) Local taxing jurisdictions shall:
(a) Cooperate fully with the State Treasurer in the development and
implementation of the system;
(b) Enact or amend any ordinances necessary to allow the reporting and
payment of occupational license fees through the system; and
(c) Develop procedures to accommodate the reporting and payment of
occupational license fees through the system, including procedures for
crediting or refunding the overpayment of occupational license fees by a
business.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 41 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) To reduce the administrative burden on businesses subject to local taxes in the
state, the State Treasurer shall appoint a working group to assist in the
modernization of reporting, collecting, and distributing local business taxes and
fees.
(2) The working group shall be chaired by the State Treasurer or his or her designee
and shall be composed of the following representatives appointed by the State
Treasurer:
(a) One (1) member of the State Treasurer’s staff;
(b) Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities;
(c) Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties;
(d) Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky Society of CPAs;
(e) One (1) member submitted by the Kentucky Association of Manufacturers;
(f) One (1) member submitted by the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce;
(g) One (1) member submitted by the Kentucky Association of Master
Contractors; and
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/3/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 301
(h) One (1) member submitted by the National Federation of Independent
Business.
(3) The working group shall meet at the call of the chair and provide
recommendations on creating a centralized system for modernizing the reporting,
collection, and distribution of local business taxes and fees. The
recommendations shall outline an implementation plan and proposed budget for
the centralized system and include:
(a) The needs for businesses and local taxing jurisdictions regarding the
functionality of a centralized system;
(b) A review of existing centralized systems for collecting local business taxes
and fees in other states;
(c) The feasibility of developing and maintaining a centralized system; and
(d) The estimated costs of developing and maintaining a centralized system,
including estimated personnel costs.
(4) By the tenth day of each month that follows a meeting of the working group, the
working group shall provide a written status report listing concerns identified and
recommendations made during the prior meeting to the Senate Standing
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the House Standing Committee
on Appropriations and Revenue, or the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/3/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed